California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4322.

Any person who attempts to secure or secures licensure for himself or herself or any other person under this chapter by making or causing to be made any false representations, or who fraudulently represents himself or herself to be registered, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding 50 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4323.

Every person who, in order to obtain any drug, falsely represents himself or herself to be a physician or other person who can lawfully prescribe the drug, or falsely represents that he or she is acting on behalf of a person who can lawfully prescribe the drug, in a telephone or electronic communication with a pharmacist, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4324.

(a) Every person who signs the name of another, or of a fictitious person, or falsely makes, alters, forges, utters, publishes, passes, or attempts to pass, as genuine, any prescription for any drugs is guilty of forgery and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year.

(b) Every person who has in his or her possession any drugs secured by a forged prescription shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 13.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4325.

(a) No person other than a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, pharmacist, or other person authorized by law to dispense, administer, or prescribe controlled substances, or the person’s agent acting under authorization by the person to print prescription blanks, and acting in the regular practice of the person’s profession, shall knowingly and willfully manufacture, copy, reproduce, or possess, or cause to be manufactured, copied, reproduced, or possessed, any prescription blank that purports to bear the name, address, and federal registry or other identifying information of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, or other person authorized by law to dispense, administer, or prescribe controlled substances.

(b) Every person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4327.

Any person who, while on duty, sells, dispenses or compounds any drug while under the influence of any dangerous drug or alcoholic beverages shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4328.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who permits the compounding or dispensing of prescriptions, or the furnishing of dangerous drugs in his or her pharmacy, except by a pharmacist, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4329.

Any nonpharmacist who takes charge of or acts as supervisor, manager, or pharmacist-in-charge of any pharmacy, or who compounds or dispenses a prescription or furnishes dangerous drugs except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 59.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4330.

(a) Any person who has obtained a license to conduct a pharmacy, who fails to place in charge of the pharmacy a pharmacist, or any person, who by himself or herself, or by any other person, permits the compounding or dispensing of prescriptions, or the furnishing of dangerous drugs, in his or her pharmacy, except by a pharmacist, or as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any pharmacy owner who commits any act that would subvert or tend to subvert the efforts of the pharmacist-in-charge to comply with the laws governing the operation of the pharmacy is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 60.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4331.

(a) A person not authorized under this chapter who takes charge of a wholesaler or veterinary food-animal drug retailer or who dispenses a prescription or furnishes dangerous devices, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person who is not a responsible manager or a designated representative-3PL who takes charge of a third-party logistics provider or coordinates the warehousing or distribution of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices within a third-party logistics provider, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) A person licensed as a
 veterinary food-animal drug retailer
 that fails to place in charge of that veterinary food-animal drug retailer a pharmacist or designated representative, or any person who, by himself or herself, or by any other person, permits the dispensing of prescriptions, except by a pharmacist or designated representative, or as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) A person licensed as a wholesaler that fails to place in charge of that wholesaler a pharmacist or designated representative, or any person who, by himself or herself, or by any other person, permits the furnishing of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices, except by a pharmacist or designated representative, or as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) A person licensed as a third-party logistics
 provider that fails to place in charge of a licensed place of business of the third-party logistics provider a responsible manager, or any person who, by himself or herself, or by any other person, permits the furnishing of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices, except by a facility manager, or as otherwise provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 9.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4332.

Any person who fails, neglects, or refuses to maintain the records required by Section 4081 or who, when called upon by an authorized officer or a member of the board, fails, neglects, or refuses to produce or provide the records within a reasonable time, or who willfully produces or furnishes records that are false, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4333.

(a) All prescriptions filled by a pharmacy and all other records required by Section 4081 shall be maintained on the premises and available for inspection by authorized officers of the law for a period of at least three years. In cases where the pharmacy discontinues business, these records shall be maintained in a board-licensed facility for at least three years.

(b) Any person who willfully fails to comply with subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200). Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the board may, upon written request, grant a waiver of the requirement that the records described in subdivisions (a) and (b) be maintained on the licensed premises or, in the event the pharmacy discontinues business, that the records be maintained in a board licensed facility. A person who maintains records in compliance with that waiver is not subject to the penalties set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) A waiver granted pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect the board’s authority under this section or any other provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4335.

Any person who knowingly violates subdivision (b) of Section 4312 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4336.

(a) Every person who knowingly or willfully violates Section 4055, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4077, 4080, 4081, 4083, or 4332 with respect to dangerous drugs by use of a minor as an agent is guilty of a felony.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall apply to a pharmacist furnishing dangerous drugs pursuant to a prescription.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4337.

Except as otherwise specified, all fines collected for violations of this chapter shall be paid as follows: one-half into the State Treasury to the credit of the Contingent Fund of the Board of Pharmacy of the State of California and one-half to the treasurer of the jurisdiction in which the misdemeanor is prosecuted, to be deposited in the same fund as fines for other misdemeanors occurring in that jurisdiction are deposited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4338.

In addition to any fine assessed under Section 4321, the judge may assess a fine not to exceed seventy dollars ($70) against any person who violates Section 4140 or 4142, with the proceeds of this fine to be used in accordance with Section 1463.23 of the Penal Code. The court shall, however, take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay and no defendant shall be denied probation because of his or her inability to pay the fine permitted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4339.

(a) The board may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter in any superior court in and for the county in which the violation has occurred. Any action shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the board shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or irreparable damage or loss. The action shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) Nothing in this section shall permit the bringing of any action with respect to any drug or product not subject to Section 4022 that is packaged or bottled in the manufacturer’s or distributor’s container and labeled in accordance with applicable federal and state drug labeling requirements.

(c) The authority granted by this section is in addition to the authority of the board to institute any other administrative, civil, or criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4340.

It is unlawful for any nonresident pharmacy that is not registered pursuant to Section 4112 or for any person who is a resident of this state to advertise the pharmacy services of any pharmacy, with the knowledge that the advertisement will or is likely to induce members of the public in this state to use the pharmacy to fill prescriptions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4341.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, prescription drugs or devices may be advertised if the advertisement conforms with the requirements of Section 651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4342.

(a) The board may institute any action or actions as may be provided by law and that, in its discretion, are necessary, to prevent the sale of pharmaceutical preparations and drugs that do not conform to the standard and tests as to quality and strength, provided in the latest edition of the United States Pharmacopoeia or the National Formulary, or that violate any provision of the Sherman Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 109875) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) Any knowing or willful violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 4006 shall be subject to punishment in the same manner as is provided in Sections 4321 and
 4336.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 8.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4343.

No building shall have upon it or displayed within it or affixed to or used in connection with it a sign bearing the word or words “Pharmacist,” “Pharmacy,” “Apothecary,” “Drugstore,” “Druggist,” “Drugs,” “Medicine,” “Medicine Store,” “Drug Sundries,” “Remedies,” or any word or words of similar or like import; or the characteristic symbols of pharmacy; or the characteristic prescription sign (Rx) or similar design, unless there is upon or within the building a pharmacy holding a license issued by the board pursuant to Section 4110.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Pharmacists Recovery Program [4360. - 4373.]

4360.

The board shall operate a pharmacists recovery program to rehabilitate pharmacists and intern pharmacists whose competency may be impaired due to abuse of alcohol, drug use, or mental illness. The intent of the pharmacists recovery program is to return these pharmacists and intern pharmacists to the practice of pharmacy in a manner that will not endanger the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4361.

(a) “Participant” means a pharmacist or intern pharmacist who has entered the pharmacists recovery program.

(b) “Pharmacists recovery program” means the rehabilitation program created by this article for pharmacists and intern pharmacists.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4362.

(a) A pharmacist or intern pharmacist may enter the pharmacists recovery program if:

(1) The pharmacist or intern pharmacist is referred by the board instead of, or in addition to, other means of disciplinary action.

(2) The pharmacist or intern pharmacist voluntarily elects to enter the pharmacists recovery program.

(b) A pharmacist or intern pharmacist who enters the pharmacists recovery program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall not be subject to discipline or other enforcement action by the board solely on his or her entry into the pharmacists recovery program or on information obtained from the pharmacist or intern pharmacist while participating in the program unless the pharmacist or intern pharmacist would pose a threat to the health and safety of the public. However, if the board receives information regarding the conduct of the pharmacist or intern pharmacist, that information may serve as a basis for discipline or other enforcement by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4364.

(a) The board shall establish criteria for the participation of pharmacists and intern pharmacists in the pharmacists recovery program.

(b) The board may deny a pharmacist or intern pharmacist who fails to meet the criteria for participation entry into the pharmacists recovery program.

(c) The establishment of criteria for participation in the pharmacists recovery program shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4365.

The board shall contract with one or more qualified contractors to administer the pharmacists recovery program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4366.

The functions of the contractor administering the pharmacists recovery program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) To evaluate those pharmacists and intern pharmacists who request participation in the program.

(b) To develop a treatment contract with each participant in the pharmacists recovery program.

(c) To monitor the compliance of each participant with their treatment contract.

(d) To prepare reports as required by the board.

(e) To inform each participant of the procedures followed in the program.

(f) To inform each participant of their rights and responsibilities in the program.

(g) To inform each participant of the possible consequences of noncompliance with the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4369.

(a) Any failure to comply with the treatment contract, determination that the participant is failing to derive benefit from the program, or other requirements of the pharmacists recovery program may result in the termination of the pharmacist’s or intern pharmacist’s participation in the pharmacists recovery program. The name and license number of a pharmacist or intern pharmacist who is terminated from the pharmacists recovery program and the basis for the termination shall be reported to the board.

(b) Participation in the pharmacists recovery program shall not be a defense to any disciplinary action that may be taken by the board.

(c) No provision of this article shall preclude the board from commencing disciplinary action against a licensee who is terminated from the pharmacists recovery program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4371.

(a) The executive officer of the board shall designate a program manager of the pharmacists recovery program. The program manager shall have background experience in dealing with substance abuse issues.

(b) The program manager shall review the pharmacists recovery program on a quarterly basis. As part of this evaluation, the program manager shall review files of all participants in the pharmacists recovery program.

(c) The program manager shall work with the contractor administering the pharmacists recovery program to evaluate participants in the program according to established guidelines and to develop treatment contracts and evaluate participant progress in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4372.

All board records and records of the pharmacists recovery program pertaining to the treatment of a pharmacist or intern pharmacist in the program shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or disclosure pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, board records and records of the pharmacists recovery program may be disclosed and testimony provided in connection with participation in the pharmacists recovery program, but only to the extent those records or testimony are relevant to the conduct for which the pharmacist or intern pharmacist was terminated from the pharmacists recovery program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 7.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

4373.

No member of the board shall be liable for any civil damages because of acts or omissions that may occur while acting in good faith pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Unfair Trade Practices [4380. - 4382.]

4380.

(a) The resale, by any person, of drugs acquired at preferentially low prices permitted under federal law only because of the Nonprofit Institutions Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 13c) is prohibited except in any of the following instances:

(1) When for the person’s own use, as defined by the federal courts in Abbott Labs. v. Portland Retail Druggists (425 U.S. 1, 47 L. Ed. 2d 537) and DeModena v. Kaiser Foundation Health Plan, Inc. (743 F. 2d 1388).

(2) When sold to a purchaser also eligible for those prices under the Nonprofit Institutions Act, that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the seller, and that purchases the products for its own use, as defined in paragraph (1).

(3) When sold to a walk-in customer pursuant to a prescription, provided that those sales represent less than 1 percent of the drugs purchased by the seller for its own use in this state.

(b) Nothing in this article prohibits the resale of drugs to any person in the occasional emergency situation where no other sources are readily available in the community to meet the emergency need.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4381.

(a) A violation of this article is an act of unfair competition within the meaning of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7, and this article is enforceable as provided in that chapter.

(b) In addition thereto, any person or trade association may bring an action to enjoin and restrain any violation of this article and to recover actual damages, if any.

(c) In an action for injunctive relief under this article, it is not necessary to allege or prove actual damages or the threat thereof, or actual injury or the threat thereof, to the plaintiff. In addition to injunctive relief, the plaintiff in any action shall recover three times the amount of his or her actual damages, if any, as well as three times the actual damages, if any, sustained by any person who has assigned to the plaintiff a claim for damages resulting from a violation of this section. In any action under this article in which judgment is entered against the defendant, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorneys’ fees together with the costs of suit.

(d) In issuing an injunction against a violation under this article, the court may, in its discretion, include any other restraint it deems expedient in order to deter the defendant from and ensure against future violations of this article.

(e) Proof of malice or intent to harm competition is immaterial to sustain a cause of action under this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4382.

The board may audit persons for compliance with the limits established in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4380 except that in the case of a facility or pharmacy that predominately serves members of a prepaid group practice health care service plan, those audits may be undertaken solely by the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to its authority to audit those plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Revenue and Renewal [4400. - 4409.]

4400.

The amount of fees and penalties prescribed by this chapter, except as otherwise provided, is that fixed by the board according to the following schedule:

(a) (1) The fee for a pharmacy license shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and may be increased to two thousand dollars ($2,000). The fee for the issuance of a temporary pharmacy permit shall be one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) and may be increased to two thousand seven hundred forty dollars ($2,740).

(2) The fee for a nonresident pharmacy license shall be two thousand four hundred twenty-seven dollars ($2,427) and may be increased to three thousand four
 hundred twenty-four dollars ($3,424). The fee for the issuance of a temporary nonresident pharmacy permit shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000) and may be increased to two thousand four hundred sixty-nine dollars ($2,469).

(b) (1) The fee for a pharmacy license annual renewal shall be one thousand twenty-five dollars ($1,025) and may be increased to two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) The fee for a nonresident pharmacy license annual renewal shall be one thousand twenty-five dollars ($1,025) and may be increased to two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(c) The fee for the pharmacist application and examination shall be two hundred sixty dollars ($260) and may be increased to two hundred eighty-five
 dollars ($285).

(d) The fee for regrading an examination shall be one hundred fifteen dollars ($115) and may be increased to two hundred dollars ($200). If an error in grading is found and the applicant passes the examination, the regrading fee shall be refunded.

(e) The fee for a pharmacist license shall be one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195) and may be increased to two hundred fifteen dollars ($215). The fee for a pharmacist biennial renewal shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) and may be reduced to three hundred sixty dollars ($360).

(f) The fee for a wholesaler or third-party logistics provider license and annual renewal shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) and may be increased to one thousand four hundred
 eleven dollars ($1,411). A temporary license fee shall be seven hundred fifteen dollars ($715) and may be increased to one thousand nine dollars ($1,009).

(g) The fee for a hypodermic license shall be five hundred fifty dollars ($550) and may be increased to seven hundred seventy-five dollars ($775). The fee for a hypodermic license renewal shall be four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to five hundred sixty-one dollars ($561).

(h) (1) The fee for application, investigation, and issuance of a license as a designated representative pursuant to Section 4053, as a designated representative-3PL pursuant to Section 4053.1, or as a designated representative-reverse distributor pursuant to Section 4053.2 shall be three hundred forty-five dollars ($345) and
 may be increased to four hundred eighty-five dollars ($485).

(2) The fee for the annual renewal of a license as a designated representative, designated representative-3PL, or designated representative-reverse distributor shall be three hundred eighty-eight dollars ($388) and may be increased to five hundred forty-seven dollars ($547).

(i) (1) The fee for the application, investigation, and issuance of a license as a designated representative for a veterinary food-animal drug retailer pursuant to Section 4053 shall be three hundred forty-five dollars ($345) and may be increased to four hundred eighty-five dollars ($485).

(2) The fee for the annual renewal of a license as a designated representative for
 a veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall be three hundred eighty-eight dollars ($388) and may be increased to five hundred forty-seven dollars ($547).

(j) (1) The application fee for a nonresident wholesaler or third-party logistics provider license issued pursuant to Section 4161 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) and may be increased to one thousand four hundred eleven dollars ($1,411).

(2) A temporary license fee shall be seven hundred fifteen dollars ($715) and may be increased to one thousand nine dollars ($1,009).

(3) The annual renewal fee for a nonresident wholesaler license or third-party logistics provider license issued pursuant to Section 4161 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000)
 and may be increased to one thousand four hundred eleven dollars ($1,411).

(k) The fee for evaluation of continuing education courses for accreditation shall be set by the board at an amount not to exceed forty dollars ($40) per course hour.

(l) The fee for an intern pharmacist license shall be one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) and may be increased to two hundred forty-five dollars ($245). The fee for transfer of intern hours or verification of licensure to another state shall be one hundred twenty dollars ($120) and may be increased to one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168).

(m) The board may waive or refund the additional fee for the issuance of a license where the license is issued less than 45 days before
 the next regular renewal date.

(n) The fee for the reissuance of any license, or renewal thereof, that has been lost or destroyed or reissued due to a name change shall be seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to one hundred dollars ($100).

(o) (1) The fee for processing an application to change information on a premises license record shall be three hundred ninety-five dollars ($395) and may be increased to five hundred fifty-seven dollars ($557).

(2) The fee for processing an application to change a name or correct an address on a premises license record shall be two hundred six dollars ($206) and may be increased to two hundred eighty-two dollars ($282).

(3) The fee for processing an application to change a pharmacist-in-charge, designated representative-in-charge, or responsible manager on a premises license record shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to three hundred fifty-three dollars ($353).

(p) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in setting fees pursuant to this section, the board shall seek to maintain a reserve in the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund equal to approximately one year’s operating expenditures.

(q) The fee for any applicant for a clinic license shall be six hundred twenty dollars ($620) and may be increased to eight hundred seventy-three dollars ($873). The annual fee for renewal of the license shall be four hundred
 dollars ($400) and may be increased to five hundred sixty-one dollars ($561).

(r) The fee for the issuance of a pharmacy technician license shall be one hundred twenty dollars ($120) and may be increased to one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165). The fee for renewal of a pharmacy technician license shall be one hundred eighty dollars ($180) and may be reduced to one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(s) The fee for a veterinary food-animal drug retailer license shall be six hundred ten dollars ($610) and may be increased to eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($825). The annual renewal fee for a veterinary food-animal drug retailer license shall be four hundred sixty dollars ($460) and may be increased to five hundred sixty-one dollars ($561). The fee for the temporary license
 shall be five hundred twenty dollars ($520) and may be increased to seven hundred thirty-two dollars ($732).

(t) The fee for issuance of a retired license pursuant to Section 4200.5 shall be fifty dollars ($50) and may be increased to one hundred dollars ($100).

(u) The fee for issuance of a sterile compounding pharmacy license or a hospital satellite compounding pharmacy shall be three thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars ($3,875) and may be increased to five thousand four hundred sixty-six dollars ($5,466). The fee for a temporary license shall be one thousand sixty-five dollars ($1,065) and may be increased to one thousand five hundred three dollars ($1,503). The annual renewal fee of the license shall be four thousand eighty-five dollars ($4,085) and may be increased to
 five thousand seven hundred sixty-two dollars ($5,762).

(v) The fee for the issuance of a nonresident sterile compounding pharmacy license shall be eight thousand five hundred dollars ($8,500) and may be increased to sixteen thousand five hundred two dollars ($16,502). The annual renewal of the license shall be eight thousand five hundred dollars ($8,500) and may be increased to seventeen thousand forty dollars ($17,040). In addition to paying that application fee, the nonresident sterile compounding pharmacy shall deposit, when submitting the application, a reasonable amount, as determined by the board, necessary to cover the board’s estimated cost of performing the inspection required by Section 4127.2. If the required deposit is not submitted with the application, the application shall be deemed to be incomplete. If the actual cost of the
 inspection exceeds the amount deposited, the board shall provide to the applicant a written invoice for the remaining amount and shall not take action on the application until the full amount has been paid to the board. If the amount deposited exceeds the amount of actual and necessary costs incurred, the board shall remit the difference to the applicant. The fee for a temporary license shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) and may be increased to two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(w) The fee for the issuance of an outsourcing facility license shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and may be increased to thirty-five thousand two hundred fifty-six dollars ($35,256). The fee for the renewal of an outsourcing facility license shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and may be increased to forty-one thousand three
 hundred sixty-six dollars ($41,366). The fee for a temporary outsourcing facility license shall be four thousand dollars ($4,000) and may be increased to five thousand six hundred forty-two dollars ($5,642).

(x) The fee for the issuance of a nonresident outsourcing facility license shall be twenty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($28,500) and may be increased to forty-two thousand three hundred eighteen dollars ($42,318). The fee for the renewal of a nonresident outsourcing facility license shall be twenty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($28,500) and may be increased to forty-six thousand three hundred fifty-three dollars ($46,353). In addition to paying that application fee, the nonresident outsourcing facility shall deposit, when submitting the application, a reasonable amount, as determined by the board, necessary to cover the
 board’s estimated cost of performing the inspection required by Section 4129.2. If the required deposit is not submitted with the application, the application shall be deemed to be incomplete. If the actual cost of the inspection exceeds the amount deposited, the board shall provide to the applicant a written invoice for the remaining amount and shall not take action on the application until the full amount has been paid to the board. If the amount deposited exceeds the amount of actual and necessary costs incurred, the board shall remit the difference to the applicant. The fee for a temporary nonresident outsourcing license shall be four thousand dollars ($4,000) and may be increased to five thousand six hundred forty-two dollars ($5,642).

(y) The fee for the issuance of a centralized hospital packaging license shall be three thousand
 eight hundred fifteen dollars ($3,815) and may be increased to five thousand three hundred eighteen dollars ($5,318). The annual renewal of the license shall be two thousand nine hundred twelve dollars ($2,912) and may be increased to four thousand one hundred seven dollars ($4,107).

(z) (1) The fee for the issuance of a license to a correctional clinic pursuant to Article 13.5 (commencing with Section 4187) shall be six hundred twenty dollars ($620) and may be increased to eight hundred seventy-three dollars ($873). The annual renewal fee for that correctional clinic license shall be four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to five hundred sixty-one dollars ($561).

(2) The fee for the issuance of an ADDS license to a correctional clinic pursuant to
 Article 13.5 (commencing with Section 4187) shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to seven hundred five dollars ($705). The annual renewal fee for the correctional clinic ADDS shall be four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to five hundred sixty-one dollars ($561).

(aa) The fee for an ADDS license shall be five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525) and may be increased to seven hundred forty-one dollars ($741). The fee for the annual renewal of the license shall be four hundred fifty-three dollars ($453) and may be increased to six hundred thirty-nine dollars ($639).

(ab) The application and initial license fee for a remote dispensing site pharmacy application shall be one thousand seven hundred thirty dollars ($1,730) and may be increased to two thousand
 four hundred forty dollars ($2,440). The fee for the annual renewal shall be one thousand twenty-five dollars ($1,025) and may be increased to two thousand dollars ($2,000). The fee for a temporary license shall be eight hundred ninety dollars ($890) and may be increased to one thousand one hundred ninety-nine dollars ($1,199).

(ac) The application and initial license fee to operate EMSADDS shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and may be increased to three hundred eighty dollars ($380) per machine. The fee for the annual renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to two hundred seventy-three dollars ($273). The license fee may not be transferred to a different location if the EMSADDS is moved. The application and renewal fee for a licensed wholesaler that is also an emergency medical services provider agency shall be
 eight hundred ten dollars ($810) and may be increased to one thousand one hundred forty-three dollars ($1,143).

(ad) The fee for application and issuance of an initial license as a designated paramedic shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to four hundred ninety-four dollars ($494). The fee of biennial renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to two hundred ninety-two dollars ($292).

(ae) The fee for an application for an advanced pharmacist practitioner license and renewal of advanced pharmacist practitioner license shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to four hundred eighteen dollars ($418).

(af) (1) For purposes of this subdivision,
 “medically underserved area” means a geographic area that does not have within 50 road miles a physical pharmacy that provides in-person patient care services by a pharmacist and serves the general public.

(2) The board shall waive the application fee for a pharmacy that opens a physical pharmacy operating and located in a medically underserved area.

(3) The board may waive the fee for the annual renewal of a license under this chapter if the licensee provides the board with certification of continued operation in the medically underserved area.

(ag) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 49.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4401.
